Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1974.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7150 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Medicare program shall provide preventative health
screenings, advanced diagnostic testing, and imaging services
annually, at no cost, to Medicare-eligible individuals in the State
of Oklahoma.
B. Covered diagnostic tests and services include, but are not
limited to:
1. Annual coverage of cardiovascular testing to include the
following:
Req. No. 10871 Page 1

a. LDL direct,
b. Apo A1,
c. Apo B,
d. Apo B: Apo A-1 ratio,
e. PLAC test,
f. Homocysteine,
g. Ox-LDL (oxidized low-density lipoprotein),
h. MPO (myeloperoxidase),
i. NT-proBNP (N-terminal pro b-type Natriuretic Peptide),
j. sdLDL (small dense low-density lipoprotein), and
k. Lp(a) (lipoprotein(a));
2. Annual coverage of diabetes testing to include the
following:
a. blood glucose,
b. HbA1c (hemoglobin A1c),
c. glycated serum proteins,
d. adiponectin,
e. ferritin,
f. beta cell function testing, and
g. insulin levels;
3. Annual coverage of endocrinology testing to include the
following:
a. ANA (antinuclear antibodies),
b. ENA (extractable nuclear antigens),
Req. No. 10871 Page 2

c. PF IgM (phospholipid IgM),
d. Anti-CCP3 IgG and IgA (anti-cyclic citrullinated
peptide),
e. T3, triiodothyronine,
f. T4, thyroxine,
g. free T3 and free T4,
h. TSH (thyroid-stimulating hormone),
i. anti-TPO (thyroid peroxidase antibodies),
j. reverse T3, and
k. anti-TG (thyroglobulin antibodies); and
4. Coverage when warranted of advanced imaging to include
magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), for comprehensive cardiovascular,
neurological, and endocrinological assessments.
C. The State Department of Health shall administer the program
in collaboration with health care providers, laboratories, and
imaging facilities statewide.
D. Health care providers shall ensure that diagnostic services
are timely, accurate, and accessible to all eligible participants.
E. Each Medicare-eligible individual shall have the option to
access these preventative services annually if determined necessary
by his or her health care provider.
F. Additional diagnostic testing may be covered if medically
justified, ensuring comprehensive disease prevention.

Req. No. 10871 Page 3

G. No eligible individual shall incur out-of-pocket expenses
for any covered services.
H. The program shall include an educational campaign to inform
eligible individuals about the availability of preventative testing
and the importance of early detection.
I. Outreach efforts shall target communities statewide,
particularly rural and underserved areas.
J. 1. The Department shall submit an annual report to the
Oklahoma Legislature detailing:
a. the number of individuals served,
b. tests and services provided,
c. impact on early disease detection rates, and
d. cost savings achieved through preventative measures.
2. The report shall include recommendations for expanding or
improving the program.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10871 TJ 01/05/25






Req. No. 10871 Page 4